Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 4 Pharmacists and Pharmacies

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 686, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of Code Sections 26-4-1 through 26-4-12 (Article 1), 26-4-30 through 26-4-41 (Article 2, Part 1), 26-4-50 through 26-4-55 (Article 2, Part 2), 26-4-70 through 26-4-87 (Article 2, Part 3), 26-4-100 through 26-4-123 (Article 2, Part 4),
26-4-130 through 26-4-138 (Article 2, Part 4A), 26-4-140 through 26-4-148 (Article 2, Part 5), 26-4-160 through 26-4-163 (Article 2, Part 6), and was based on Code 1933, § 79A-101 et seq., enacted by Ga. L. 1967, p. 296, § 1 and Ga. L. 1860, p. 54, § 1, Ga. L. 1876, p. 24 §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1882, § 4557(a) et seq., Penal Code 1895, § 470 et seq., Penal Code 1910, § 454 et seq., Ga. L. 1927, p. 291, § 14, Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 89, Ga. L. 1933, § 42-701 et seq., Ga. L. 1933, § 84-1314, Ga. L. 1939, p. 228, § 1-3, Ga. L. 1945, p. 421, § 1, Ga. L. 1947, p. 734, §§ 1-2, Ga. L. 1947, p. 1463, §§ 1, 4, Ga. L. 1947, p. 1471, §§ 5, 7, Ga. L. 1953, p. 395, § 1, Ga. L. 1956, p. 345, § 1, Ga. L. 1956, p. 724, § 2, Ga. L. 1957, p. 92, § 1, Ga. L. 1961, p. 529, §§ 19-20, 25, Ga. L. 1962, p. 105, §§ 17, 18, 20, 21, Ga. L. 1964, p. 276, § 1,
Ga. L. 1966, p. 254, § 1, Ga. L. 1969, p. 936, § 1, Ga. L. 1970, p. 215, § 1, Ga. L. 1970, p. 465, § 1, Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, §§ 19, 21, Ga. L. 1974, p. 221, § 2, Ga. L. 1974, p. 535, § 1-2, Ga. L. 1975, p. 97, § 1, Ga. L. 1976, p. 675, § 1, Ga. L. 1977, p. 625, §§ 1-6, Ga. L. 1977, p. 1093, § 1, Ga. L. 1978, p. 1668, §§ 1, 4, Ga. L. 1978, p. 1962, §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1978, p. 1668, § 1-4, Ga. L. 1978, p. 1962, §§ 1, 3,
Ga. L. 1979, p. 859, § 1-2, Ga. L. 1980, p. 1746, §§ 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, Ga. L. 1980, p. 1761, § 1, Ga. L. 1981, p. 557, §§ 1, 6, Ga. L. 1981, p. 782, § 1-2, Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26, Ga. L. 1982, p. 1156, §§ 1, 2, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, Ga. L. 1982, p. 1264, §§ 1,4, Ga. L. 1982, p. 2403, §§ 1, 2, 22, 23, Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 19, Ga. L. 1983, p. 790, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1983, p. 1441, § 1, Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 26, Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 26, Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 26, Ga. L. 1986, p. 929, § 1, Ga. L. 1986, p. 1031, §§ 2-4, Ga. L. 1986, p. 1603, §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1987, p. 1131, §§ 1-3, Ga. L. 1989, p. 261, § 1, Ga. L. 1989, p. 509, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 26, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1307, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 3137, § 43, Ga. L. 1996, p. 1425, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 1609, §§ 2-9.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Licensure of a Pharmacist, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Joint Secretary, Professional Licensing Boards, Chapter 480-2.

Pharmacy Regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Chapter 480-10.

Pharmaceutical Compounding, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Chapter 480-11.

Hospice Emergency Drug Kits, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Nursing Homes, Long Term Care Facilities and Hospice Emergency Drug Kits, Rule 480-24-.07.

Remote Automated Medication Systems, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Board of Pharmacy, Chapter 480-37.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Process Is Due: The World Health Organization Prequalification of Medicines,” see 68 Emory L.J. 645 (2019).